California statutes. Penal Code
Any person who possesses nitrous oxide or any substance containing nitrous oxide, with the intent to breathe, inhale, or ingest for the purpose of causing a condition of intoxication, elation, euphoria, dizziness, stupefaction, or dulling of the senses or for the purpose of, in any manner, changing, distorting, or disturbing the audio, visual, or mental processes, or who knowingly and with the intent to do so is under the influence of nitrous oxide or any material containing nitrous oxide is guilty of a misdemeanor. This section shall not apply to any person who is under the influence of nitrous oxide or any material containing nitrous oxide pursuant to an administration for the purpose of medical, surgical, or dental care by a person duly licensed to administer such an agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 999, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

381c.

(a) As used in this section, “nitrous oxide” refers to any of the following substances: N2O, dinitrogen monoxide, dinitrogen oxide, nitrogen oxide, or laughing gas.

(b) Every person who sells, furnishes, administers, distributes, gives away, or offers to sell, furnish, administer, distribute, or give away a device, canister, tank, or receptacle either exclusively containing nitrous oxide or exclusively containing a chemical compound mixed with nitrous oxide, to a person under 18 years of age is guilty of a misdemeanor. The court shall consider ordering the person to perform community service as a condition of probation.

(c) (1) It is a defense to this crime that the defendant honestly and reasonably believed that the minor involved in the offense was at least 18 years of age.

(2) The defendant shall bear the burden of establishing this defense by a preponderance of the evidence.

(d) For the purpose of preventing a violation of this section, any person may refuse to sell, furnish, administer, distribute, or give away a device, canister, tank, or receptacle either exclusively containing nitrous oxide or exclusively containing a chemical compound mixed with nitrous oxide to a person who is unable to produce adequate proof of age of majority.

(e) On and after July 1, 2010, the court shall order the suspension of the business license, for a period of up to one year, of a person who knowingly violates this section after having been previously convicted of a violation of this section, unless the owner of the business license can demonstrate a good faith attempt to prevent illegal sales or deliveries by the owner’s employees.

(f) This section shall not apply to any person who administers nitrous oxide for the purpose of providing medical or
 dental care, if administered by a medical or dental practitioner licensed by this state or at the direction or under the supervision of a practitioner licensed by this state.

(g) This section does not apply to the sale of nitrous oxide contained in food products for use as a propellant.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, Ch. 266, Sec. 1.   (AB 1015)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

381d.

(a) A person who dispenses or distributes nitrous oxide to a person, and knows or should know that the person is going to use the nitrous oxide in violation of Section 381b, and that person proximately causes great bodily injury or death to himself, herself, or another person, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail, not to exceed six months, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) This section shall not preclude prosecution under any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 458, Sec. 1.   (AB 1735)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

381e.

(a) A person who dispenses or distributes nitrous oxide shall record each transaction involving the dispensing or distribution of nitrous oxide in a written or electronic document. The person dispensing or distributing the nitrous oxide shall require the purchaser to sign the document and provide a complete residential address and present a valid government-issued photo identification. The person dispensing or distributing the nitrous oxide shall sign and date the document and shall retain the document at the person’s business address for one year from the date of the transaction. The person shall make the documents available during normal business hours for inspection and copying,
 upon presentation of a duly authorized search warrant, by officers or employees of the California State Board of Pharmacy or of other law enforcement agencies of this state or the United States.

(b) The document used to record each transaction shall inform the purchaser of all of the following:

(1) That inhalation of nitrous oxide outside of a clinical setting may have dangerous health effects.

(2) That it is a violation of state law to possess nitrous oxide or any substance containing nitrous oxide, with the intent to breathe, inhale, or ingest it for the purpose of intoxication.

(3) That it is a violation of state law to knowingly distribute or dispense
 nitrous oxide or any substance containing nitrous oxide, to a person who intends to breathe, inhale, or ingest it for the purpose of intoxication.

(c) This section shall not apply to any person who administers nitrous oxide for the purpose of providing medical or dental care, if administered by a medical or dental practitioner licensed by this state or at the direction or under the supervision of a practitioner licensed by this state.

(d) This section does not apply to the sale of nitrous oxide contained in food products for use as a propellant.

(e) This section shall not apply to the sale or distribution of nitrous oxide by a wholesaler licensed by the Board of Pharmacy or manufacturer classified under Code Number
 325120 or 424690 of the North American Industry Classification System (NAICS).

(f) (1) Information obtained from a person to whom nitrous oxide was distributed or dispensed pursuant to this section shall be confidential and shall be used solely for the purposes provided in this section.

(2) Except as provided in this section, a person who dispenses or distributes nitrous oxide shall not use, review, or disclose any information obtained pursuant to this section.

(3) A person who violates this
 subdivision shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed six months, or by a fine not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 458, Sec. 2.   (AB 1735)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

382.

Every person who adulterates or dilutes any article of food, drink, drug, medicine, spirituous or malt liquor, or wine, or any article useful in compounding them, with the fraudulent intent to offer the same, or cause or permit it to be offered for sale as unadulterated or undiluted; and every person who fraudulently sells, or keeps or offers for sale the same, as unadulterated or undiluted, or who, in response to an inquiry for any article of food, drink, drug, medicine, spirituous or malt liquor, or wine, sells or offers for sale, a different article, or an article of a different character or manufacture, without first informing such purchaser of such difference, is guilty of a misdemeanor; provided, that no retail dealer shall be convicted under the provisions of this section if he shall prove a written guaranty of purity obtained from the person from whom he purchased such adulterated or diluted goods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1903, Ch. 254.)
-------------------------------------------

382.4.

No person, other than a licensed veterinarian, shall administer succinylcholine, also known as sucostrin, to any dog or cat.

Violation of this section shall constitute a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1083.)
-------------------------------------------

382.5.

Every person who sells, dispenses, administers or prescribes dinitrophenol for any purpose shall be guilty of a felony, punishable by a fine not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

This section shall not apply to dinitrophenol manufactured or sold as an economic poison registered under the provision of Section 12811 of the Food and Agricultural Code nor to sales for use in manufacturing or for scientific purposes, and not for human consumption.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 340.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

382.6.

Every person who sells, dispenses, administers or prescribes preparations containing diphenylamine, paraphenylenediamine, or paratoluylenediamine, or a derivative of any such chemicals, to be used as eyebrow and eyelash dye, shall be guilty of a felony, punishable by a fine not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 341.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

382.7.

Every person who knowingly prescribes, dispenses, administers, or furnishes any liquid silicone substance for the purpose of injection into a human breast or mammary is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 949.)
-------------------------------------------

383.

Every person who knowingly sells, or keeps or offers for sale, or otherwise disposes of any article of food, drink, drug, or medicine, knowing that the same is adulterated or has become tainted, decayed, spoiled, or otherwise unwholesome or unfit to be eaten or drunk, with intent to permit the same to be eaten or drunk, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and must be fined not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned in the county jail not exceeding six months, or both, and may, in the discretion of the court, be adjudged to pay, in addition, all the necessary expenses, not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), incurred in inspecting and analyzing such articles. The term “drug,” as used herein, includes all medicines for internal or external use, antiseptics, disinfectants, and cosmetics. The term “food,” as used herein, includes all articles used for food or drink by man, whether simple, mixed, or compound. Any article is deemed to be adulterated within the meaning of this section:

(a) In case of drugs: (1) if, when sold under or by a name recognized in the United States Pharmacopoeia, it differs materially from the standard of strength, quality, or purity laid down therein; (2) if, when sold under or by a name not recognized in the United States Pharmacopoeia, but which is found in some other pharmacopoeia or other standard work on materia medica, it differs materially from the standard of strength, quality, or purity laid down in such work; (3) if its strength, quality, or purity falls below the professed standard under which it is sold.

(b) In the case of food: (1) if any substance or substances have been mixed with it, so as to lower or depreciate, or injuriously affect its quality, strength, or purity; (2) if any inferior or cheaper substance or substances have been substituted wholly or in part for it; (3) if any valuable or necessary constituent or ingredient has been wholly or in part abstracted from it; (4) if it is an imitation of, or is sold under the name of, another article; (5) if it consists wholly, or in part, of a diseased, decomposed, putrid, infected, tainted, or rotten animal or vegetable substance or article, whether manufactured or not; or in the case of milk, if it is the produce of a diseased animal; (6) if it is colored, coated, polished, or powdered, whereby damage or inferiority is concealed, or if by any means it is made to appear better or of greater value than it really is; (7) if it contains any added substance or ingredient which is poisonous or injurious to health.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1125.)
-------------------------------------------

383a.

Any person, firm, or corporation, who sells or offers for sale, or has in his or its possession for sale, any butter manufactured by boiling, melting, deodorizing, or renovating, which is the product of stale, rancid, or decomposed butter, or by any other process whereby stale, rancid, or decomposed butter is manufactured to resemble or appear like creamery or dairy butter, unless the same is plainly stenciled or branded upon each and every package, barrel, firkin, tub, pail, square, or roll, in letters not less than one half inch in length, “process butter,” or “renovated butter,” in such a manner as to advise the purchaser of the real character of such “process” or “renovated” butter, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1905, Ch. 573.)
-------------------------------------------

383b.

Every person who with intent to defraud, sells or exposes for sale any meat or meat preparations, and falsely represents the same to be kosher, whether such meat or meat preparations be raw or prepared for human consumption, or as having been prepared under and from a product or products sanctioned by the orthodox Hebrew religious requirements; or falsely represents any food product, or the contents of any package or container, to be so constituted and prepared, by having or permitting to be inscribed thereon the words “kosher” in any language; or sells or exposes for sale in the same place of business both kosher and nonkosher meat or meat preparations, either raw or prepared for human consumption, who fails to indicate on his window signs in all display advertising in block letters at least four inches in height “kosher and nonkosher meats sold here”; or who exposes for sale in any show window or place of business as both kosher and nonkosher meat preparations, either raw or prepared for human consumption, who fails to display over each kind of meat or meat preparation so exposed a sign in block letters at least four inches in height, reading “kosher meat” or “nonkosher meat” as the case may be; or sells or exposes for sale in any restaurant or any other place where food products are sold for consumption on the premises, any article of food or food preparations and falsely represents the same to be kosher, or as having been prepared in accordance with the orthodox Hebrew religious requirements; or sells or exposes for sale in such restaurant, or such other place, both kosher and nonkosher food or food preparations for consumption on the premises, not prepared in accordance with the Jewish ritual, or not sanctioned by the Hebrew orthodox religious requirements, and who fails to display on his window signs in all display advertising, in block letters at least four inches in height “kosher and nonkosher food served here” is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof be punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than six hundred dollars ($600), or imprisonment in the county jail of not less than 30 days, nor more than 90 days, or both such fine and imprisonment.

The word “kosher” is here defined to mean a strict compliance with every Jewish law and custom pertaining and relating to the killing of the animal or fowl from which the meat is taken or extracted, the dressing, treatment and preparation thereof for human consumption, and the manufacture, production, treatment and preparation of such other food or foods in connection wherewith Jewish laws and customs obtain and to the use of tools, implements, vessels, utensils, dishes and containers that are used in connection with the killing of such animals and fowls and the dressing, preparation, production, manufacture and treatment of such meats and other products, foods and food stuffs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 278.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

383c.

Every person who with intent to defraud, sells or exposes for sale any meat or meat preparations, and falsely represents the same to be halal, whether the meat or meat preparations is raw or prepared for human consumption, or as having been prepared under and from a product or products sanctioned by the Islamic religious requirements; or falsely represents any food product, or the contents of any package or container, to be so constituted and prepared, by having or permitting to be inscribed thereon the word “halal” in any language; or sells or exposes for sale in the same place of business both halal and nonhalal meat or meat preparations, either raw or prepared for human consumption, who fails to indicate on his or her window signs in all display advertising in block letters at least four inches in height “halal and nonhalal meats sold here”; or who exposes for sale in any show window or place of business as both halal and nonhalal meat preparations, either raw or prepared for human consumption, who fails to display over each kind of meat or meat preparation so exposed a sign in block letters at least four inches in height, reading “halal meat” or “nonhalal meat” as the case may be; or sells or exposes for sale in any restaurant or any other place where food products are sold for consumption on the premises, any article of food or food preparations and falsely represents the same to be halal, or as having been prepared in accordance with the Islamic religious requirements; or sells or exposes for sale in a restaurant, or other place, both halal and nonhalal food or food preparations for consumption on the premises, not prepared in accordance with the Islamic ritual, or not sanctioned by Islamic religious requirements, and who fails to display on his or her window signs in all display advertising, in block letters at least four inches in height “halal and nonhalal food served here” is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof be punishable by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100), nor more than six hundred dollars ($600), or imprisonment in a county jail of not less than 30 days, nor more than 90 days, or both that fine and imprisonment.

The word “halal” is here defined to mean a strict compliance with every Islamic law and custom pertaining and relating to the killing of the animal or fowl from which the meat is taken or extracted, the dressing, treatment, and preparation thereof for human consumption, and the manufacture, production, treatment, and preparation of other food or foods in connection wherewith Islamic laws and customs obtain and to the use of tools, implements, vessels, utensils, dishes, and containers that are used in connection with the killing of animals and fowls and the dressing, preparation, production, manufacture, and treatment of meats and other products, foods, and food stuffs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 62, Sec. 226.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

384.

(a) Any person who shall wilfully refuse to immediately relinquish a party line when informed that such line is needed for an emergency call, and in fact such line is needed for an emergency call, to a fire department or police department or for medical aid or ambulance service, or any person who shall secure the use of a party line by falsely stating that such line is needed for an emergency call, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(b) “Party line” as used in this section means a subscribers’ line telephone circuit, consisting of two or more main telephone stations connected therewith, each station with a distinctive ring or telephone number. “Emergency” as used in this section means a situation in which property or human life is in jeopardy and the prompt summoning of aid is essential.

(c) Every telephone directory hereafter published and distributed to the members of the general public in this State or in any portion thereof which lists the calling numbers of telephones of any telephone exchange located in this State shall contain a notice which explains the offense provided for in this section, such notice to be printed in type which is not smaller than any other type on the same page and to be preceded by the word “warning” printed in type at least as large as the largest type on the same page; provided, that the provisions of this subdivision shall not apply to those directories distributed solely for business advertising purposes, commonly known as classified directories, nor to any telephone directory heretofore distributed to the general public. Any person, firm or corporation providing telephone service which distributes or causes to be distributed in this State copies of a telephone directory which is subject to the provisions of this section and which do not contain the notice herein provided for shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 533.)
-------------------------------------------

384.5.

(a) (1) Any person who removes any minor forest products from the property where the products were cut and transports the products upon any public road or highway shall have in the person’s possession a valid bill of sale for the products or a written permit issued by the owner of the property from which the products were removed authorizing the removal and transport.

(2) Any such permit or bill of sale shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The name, address, and signature of the landowner, and phone number, if available.

(B) The name, address, and signature of the permittee or purchaser.

(C) The amount, species, and type of minor forest products to be removed and transported.

(D) A description sufficient to identify the property from which the minor forest products are to be removed.

(E) The date of issuance of the permit or bill of sale and the duration of the period of time within which the minor forest products may be removed.

(F) Any conditions or additional information which the landowner may impose or include.

(3) Any permit for the removal of minor forest products from public lands that is issued by the United States Forest Service or the Bureau of Land Management is sufficient for the purposes of this subdivision, regardless of whether the permit conforms to the specific requirements as to content set forth in paragraph (2).

(4) For the purposes of this subdivision, “minor forest products” means firewood, posts, shakeboards, shake and shingle bolts, or split products, in quantities exceeding 20 cubic feet in volume, and burlwood or stumps, in quantities of two or more.

(b) This section shall not apply to the transport of any minor forest products carried in a passenger vehicle, as defined in Section 465 of the Vehicle Code.

(c) Violation of subdivision (a) is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 225, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

384a.

(a) (1) A person shall not willfully or negligently cut, destroy, mutilate, or remove plant material that is growing upon state or county highway rights-of-way.

(2) A person shall not willfully or negligently cut, destroy, mutilate, or remove plant material that is growing upon public land or upon land that is not his or hers without a written permit from the owner of the land, signed by the owner of the land or the owner’s authorized agent, as provided in subdivision (c).

(3) A person shall not knowingly sell, offer or expose for sale, or transport for sale plant material
 that is cut or removed in violation of this subdivision.

(b) For purposes of this section, “plant material” means a tree, shrub, fern, herb, bulb, cactus, flower, huckleberry, or redwood green, or a portion of any of those, or the leaf mold on those plants. “Plant material” does not include a tree, shrub, fern, herb, bulb, cactus, flower, or greens declared by law to be a public nuisance.

(c) (1) The written permit required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) shall be signed by the landowner, or the landowner’s authorized agent, and acknowledged before a notary public, or other person authorized by law to take acknowledgments. The permit shall contain the number and species of trees and amount of plant material, and shall contain the legal description of the
 real property as usually found in deeds and conveyances of the land on which cutting or removal shall take place. One copy of the permit shall be filed in the office of the sheriff of the county in which the land described in the permit is located. The permit shall be filed prior to the commencement of cutting or removal of plant material authorized by the permit.

(2) The permit required by this section need not be notarized or filed with the sheriff when five or less pounds of shrubs or boughs are to be cut or removed.

(d) A county or state fire warden; personnel of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, as designated by the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection; personnel of the United States Forest Service, as designated by the Regional Forester, Region 5, of the
 United States Forest Service; or a peace officer of the State of California, may enforce the provisions of this section and may confiscate any and all plant material unlawfully cut or removed or knowingly sold, offered, or exposed or transported for sale as provided in this section.

(e) This section does not apply to any of the following:

(1) An employee of the state or of a political subdivision of the state who is engaged in work upon a state, county, or public road or highway while performing work under the supervision of the state or a political subdivision of the state.

(2) A person engaged in the necessary cutting or trimming of
 plant material for the purpose of protecting or maintaining an electric powerline, telephone line, or other property of a public utility.

(3) A person engaged in logging operations or fire suppression.

(f) A violation of this section shall be a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), by imprisonment in a county jail for not more than six months, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 499, Sec. 2.   (SB 795)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

384b.

For the purposes of Sections 384c through 384f, inclusive, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions contained in this section govern the construction of those sections.

(a) “Person” includes an employee with wages as his or her sole compensation.

(b) “Permit” means a permit as required by Section 384a.

(c) “Tree” means any evergreen tree or top thereof which is harvested without having the limbs and foliage removed.

(d) “Shrub” means any toyon or Christmas red-berry shrub or any of the following native desert plants: all species of the family Cactaceae (cactus family); and Agave deserti (desert agave), Agave utahensis (Utah agave), Nolina bigelovii, Nolina parryi (Parry nolina), Nolina wolfii, Yucca baccata, Yucca brevifolia (Joshua tree), Yucca schidigera (Mohave yucca), Yucca whipplei (Whipple yucca), Cercidium floridum (blue palo verde), Cercidium microphyllum (little leaf palo verde), Dalea spinosa (smoke tree), Olneya tesota (ironwood tree), and Fouquieria splendens (ocotillo), or any part thereof, except the fruit thereof, which is harvested without having the limbs and foliage removed.

(e) “Bough” means any limb or foliage removed from an evergreen tree.

(f) “Peace officer” means any county or state fire warden, personnel of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection as designated by the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection, personnel of the United States Forest Service as designated by the Regional Forester, Region 5 of the United States Forest Service, personnel of the United States Department of the Interior as designated by them, or any peace officer of the State of California.

(g) “Harvest” means to remove or cut and remove from the place where grown.

(h) “Harvester” means a person who harvests a tree, shrub, or bough.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 427, Sec. 126.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

384c.

Persons purchasing trees, shrubs, or boughs from harvesters thereof shall not transport more than five trees or more than five pounds of shrubs or boughs on the public roads or highways without obtaining from the seller of the trees, shrubs, or boughs and having validated as provided in Section 384d a transportation tag for each load of the trees, shrubs, or boughs.

Unless a valid transportation tag issued in California for a tree, shrub, or bough has already been obtained, persons who harvest trees, shrubs, or boughs from their own land or the land of another or who are in possession of trees, shrubs, or boughs shall, before transporting on the public roads or highways or selling or consigning for removal and transportation over the public roads and highways more than five trees or more than five pounds of other shrubs or boughs, file with the sheriff of each county in which the trees, shrubs, or boughs are to be harvested an application for transportation tags and obtain a supply of these transportation tags sufficient to provide one tag for each load of trees, shrubs, or boughs to be so transported or sold.

No person shall knowingly make any false statement on any application for the transportation tags and the application shall contain, but is not limited to, the following information:

(a) The name and address of the applicant.

(b) The amount and species of trees, shrubs, or boughs to be transported.

(c) The name of the county from which the trees, shrubs, or boughs are to be removed.

(d) A legal description of the real property from which the trees, shrubs, or boughs are to be removed.

(e) The name or names of the owner of the real property from which the trees, shrubs, or boughs are to be removed.

(f) The applicant’s timber operator permit number, if the harvesting of the trees, shrubs, or boughs is subject to the Z’berg-Nejedly Forest Practice Act of 1973 (Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 4511) of Part 2 of Division 4 of the Public Resources Code).

(g) The destination of the trees, shrubs, or boughs.

(h) The proposed date or dates of the transportation.

Every applicant shall, at the time of application, show to the sheriff his or her permit or proof of ownership of the trees, shrubs, or boughs. The application forms and transportation tags shall be printed and distributed by the sheriff of each county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1318, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

384d.

Upon the filing of an application containing the information required by Section 384c, and the presentation of a permit or proof of ownership as required by Section 384c, the county sheriff’s office shall issue to persons who harvest or have in their possession, trees, shrubs or boughs within the county sufficient transportation tags stamped with the county seal and identified by the applicant’s timber operator permit number, if any, to enable the person transporting any of the trees, shrubs or boughs harvested within the county by the applicant to have a tag accompany each and every load of such trees, shrubs or boughs. Harvesters of trees, shrubs or boughs, when selling from stockpile location, shall furnish to the purchaser of trees, shrubs or boughs a bill of sale and a transportation tag for each load or part thereof bearing the harvester’s timber operator permit number, if any, and other information as hereinafter required.

The purchaser of harvested trees, shrubs or boughs or the harvester when transporting his own trees, shrubs or boughs shall have the transportation tag validated by a peace officer in the county of purchase or harvest or by the nearest peace officer in an adjacent county when the transportation route used does not pass an office of a peace officer in the county of purchase or harvest. The validated transportation tag or tags shall remain with the load to the marketing area.

The transportation tags shall be in two parts; one to be retained by the transporting party; one to be retained by the validating peace officer and forwarded to the county sheriff. The transportation tags shall be validated and in force only for the proposed date or dates of transportation as specified in the application for the transportation tags. The transportation tags will be validated without fee and each shall contain the following information: name and address of the person obtaining and using the tag; number or amount of each species of trees, shrubs and boughs in the load; make, model and license number of the transporting vehicle; the county of origin and county of destination; the specified period of time during which the transportation tag is in force; date and validating signature and title of a peace officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

384e.

(a) The transportation tag described in Section 384d shall be presented to any peace officer upon demand.

(b) Failure to produce a transportation tag properly filled out and validated upon demand of any peace officer shall constitute sufficient grounds to hold in protective custody the entire load of trees, shrubs or boughs, until proof of legal right to transport is furnished.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1830.)
-------------------------------------------

384f.

Any person violating any of the provisions of Sections 384b through 384f shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in the county jail not exceeding six months or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 281.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

384h.

Every person who willfully or negligently, while hunting upon the inclosed lands of another, kills, maims, or wounds an animal, the property of another, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 384c by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1830.)
-------------------------------------------

384i.

(a) Sections 384a to 384f, inclusive, shall not apply to maintenance and construction activities of public agencies and their employees.

(b) Sections 384b to 384f, inclusive, shall not apply to native desert plants described in subdivision (b) of Section 384b, that have been propagated and cultivated by human beings and which are being transported under Section 6922 or 6923 of the Food and Agricultural Code, pursuant to a valid nursery stock certificate.

(c) Sections 384a to 384f, inclusive, shall not apply to any act regulated by the provisions of Division 23 (commencing with Section 80001) of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

385.

(a) The term “high voltage” as used in this section means a voltage in excess of 750 volts, measured between conductors or measured between the conductor and the ground.

The term “overhead conductor” as used in this section means any electrical conductor (either bare or insulated) installed above the ground except such conductors as are enclosed in iron pipe or other metal covering of equal strength.

(b) Any person who either personally or through an employee or agent, or as an employee or agent of another, operates, places, erects or moves any tools, machinery, equipment, material, building or structure within six feet of a high voltage overhead conductor is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) It shall be a misdemeanor to own, operate or to employ any person to operate, any crane, derrick, power shovel, drilling rig, hay loader, hay stacker, pile driver, or similar apparatus, any part of which is capable of vertical, lateral or swinging motion, unless there is posted and maintained in plain view of the operator thereof, a durable warning sign legible at 12 feet, reading: “Unlawful to operate this equipment within six feet of high voltage lines.”

Each day’s failure to post or maintain such sign shall constitute a separate violation.

(d) The provisions of this section shall not apply to (1) the construction, reconstruction, operation or maintenance of any high voltage overhead conductor, or its supporting structures or appurtenances by persons authorized by the owner, or (2) the operation of standard rail equipment which is normally used in the transportation of freight or passengers, or the operation of relief trains or other emergency railroad equipment by persons authorized by the owner, or (3) any construction, reconstruction, operation or maintenance of any overhead structures covered by the rules for overhead line construction prescribed by the Public Utilities Commission of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 1229.)
-------------------------------------------

386.

(a) Any person who willfully or maliciously constructs or maintains a fire-protection system in any structure with the intent to install a fire protection system which is known to be inoperable or to impair the effective operation of a system, so as to threaten the safety of any occupant or user of the structure in the event of a fire, shall be subject to imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for two, three, or four years.

(b) A violation of subdivision (a) which proximately results in great bodily injury or death is a felony punishable by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for five, six, or seven years.

(c) As used in this section, “fire-protection system” includes, but is not limited to, an automatic fire sprinkler system, standpipe system, automatic fixed fire extinguishing system, and fire alarm system.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following definitions shall control:

(1) “Automatic fire sprinkler system” means an integrated system of underground and overhead piping designed in accordance with fire protection engineering standards. The portion of the sprinkler system above ground is a network of specially sized or hydraulically designed piping installed in a building, structure, or area, generally overhead, and to which sprinklers are attached in a systematic pattern. The valve controlling each system riser is located in the system riser or its supply piping. Each sprinkler system riser includes a device
 for activating an alarm when the system is in operation. The system is normally activated by heat from a fire, and it discharges water over the fire area.

(2) “Standpipe system” means an arrangement of piping, valves, and hose connectors and allied equipment installed in a building or structure with the hose connectors located in a manner that water can be discharged in streams or spray patterns through attached hose and nozzles. The purpose of the system is to extinguish a fire, thereby protecting a building or structure and its contents and occupants. This system relies upon connections to water supply systems or pumps, tanks, and other equipment necessary to provide an adequate supply of water to the hose connectors.
